test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-II-pimamon_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

   Lemma - pimamon : 

      # Core 

      # Prs+Ind
      pimamon+V+II+Ind+3Sg: pimamon   # it runs along, it passes along a road or rail

      # Prs+Cnj
      PV/î+pimamon+V+II+Cnj+3Sg: î-pimamok   # as it runs along, as it passes along a road or rail
      

      # Prs # Ind
      pimamon+V+II+Ind+3Sg: pimamon   # it runs along, it passes along a road or rail
      pimamon+V+II+Ind+4Sg: pimamonithiw   # it over there runs along, it over there passes along a road or rail
      pimamon+V+II+Ind+3Pl: pimamonwa   # they run along, they pass along a road or rail
      pimamon+V+II+Ind+4Pl: pimamonithiwa   # they over there run along, they over there pass along a road or rail
      

      # Prs # Cnj
      PV/î+pimamon+V+II+Cnj+3Sg: î-pimamok   # as it runs along, as it passes along a road or rail
      PV/î+pimamon+V+II+Cnj+4Sg: î-pimamonithik   # as it over there runs along, as it over there passes along a road or rail
      PV/î+pimamon+V+II+Cnj+3Pl: î-pimamoki   # as they run along, as they pass along a road or rail
      PV/î+pimamon+V+II+Cnj+3Pl+Var/East: [î-pimamokwâ, î-pimamokiht]   # as they run along, as they pass along a road or rail
      PV/î+pimamon+V+II+Cnj+4Pl: î-pimamonithiki   # as they over there run along, as they over there pass along a road or rail
      PV/î+pimamon+V+II+Cnj+4Pl+Var/East: î-pimamonithikwâ   # as they over there run along, as they over there pass along a road or rail
      

      # Prt # Ind
      PV/ki+pimamon+V+II+Ind+3Sg: kî-pimamon   # it ran along, it passed along a road or rail
      PV/ki+pimamon+V+II+Ind+4Sg: kî-pimamonithiw   # it over there ran along, it over there passed along a road or rail
      PV/ki+pimamon+V+II+Ind+3Pl: kî-pimamonwa   # they ran along, they passed along a road or rail
      PV/ki+pimamon+V+II+Ind+4Pl: kî-pimamonithiwa   # they over there ran along, they over there passed along a road or rail
      

      # Prt # Cnj
      PV/î+PV/ki+pimamon+V+II+Cnj+3Sg: î-kî-pimamok   # as it ran along, as it passed along a road or rail
      PV/î+PV/ki+pimamon+V+II+Cnj+4Sg: î-kî-pimamonithik   # as it over there ran along, as it over there passed along a road or rail
      PV/î+PV/ki+pimamon+V+II+Cnj+3Pl: î-kî-pimamoki   # as they ran along, as they passed along a road or rail
      PV/î+PV/ki+pimamon+V+II+Cnj+3Pl+Var/East: [î-kî-pimamokwâ, î-kî-pimamokiht]   # as they ran along, as they passed along a road or rail
      PV/î+PV/ki+pimamon+V+II+Cnj+4Pl: î-kî-pimamonithiki   # as they over there ran along, as they over there passed along a road or rail
      PV/î+PV/ki+pimamon+V+II+Cnj+4Pl+Var/East: î-kî-pimamonithikwâ   # as they over there ran along, as they over there passed along a road or rail
      

      # Fut+Int # Ind
      PV/wi+pimamon+V+II+Ind+3Sg: wî-pimamon   # it is going to run along, it is going to pass along a road or rail
      PV/wi+pimamon+V+II+Ind+4Sg: wî-pimamonithiw   # it over there is going to run along, it over there is going to pass along a road or rail
      PV/wi+pimamon+V+II+Ind+3Pl: wî-pimamonwa   # they are going to run along, they are going to pass along a road or rail
      PV/wi+pimamon+V+II+Ind+4Pl: wî-pimamonithiwa   # they over there are going to run along, they over there are going to pass along a road or rail
      

      # Fut+Int # Cnj
      PV/î+PV/wi+pimamon+V+II+Cnj+3Sg: î-wî-pimamok   # as it is going to run along, as it is going to pass along a road or rail
      PV/î+PV/wi+pimamon+V+II+Cnj+4Sg: î-wî-pimamonithik   # as it over there is going to run along, as it over there is going to pass along a road or rail
      PV/î+PV/wi+pimamon+V+II+Cnj+3Pl: î-wî-pimamoki   # as they are going to run along, as they are going to pass along a road or rail
      PV/î+PV/wi+pimamon+V+II+Cnj+3Pl+Var/East: [î-wî-pimamokwâ, î-wî-pimamokiht]   # as they are going to run along, as they are going to pass along a road or rail
      PV/î+PV/wi+pimamon+V+II+Cnj+4Pl: î-wî-pimamonithiki   # as they over there are going to run along, as they over there are going to pass along a road or rail
      PV/î+PV/wi+pimamon+V+II+Cnj+4Pl+Var/East: î-wî-pimamonithikwâ   # as they over there are going to run along, as they over there are going to pass along a road or rail
      

      # Fut+Def # Ind
      PV/ka+pimamon+V+II+Ind+3Sg: ka-pimamon   # it will run along, it will pass along a road or rail
      PV/ka+pimamon+V+II+Ind+4Sg: ka-pimamonithiw   # it over there will run along, it over there will pass along a road or rail
      PV/ka+pimamon+V+II+Ind+3Pl: ka-pimamonwa   # they will run along, they will pass along a road or rail
      PV/ka+pimamon+V+II+Ind+4Pl: ka-pimamonithiwa   # they over there will run along, they over there will pass along a road or rail
      

      # Inf # PV/ka
      PV/ka+pimamon+V+II+Cnj+3Sg: ka-pimamok   # it will run along, it will pass along a road or rail
      PV/ka+pimamon+V+II+Cnj+4Sg: ka-pimamonithik   # it over there will run along, it over there will pass along a road or rail
      PV/ka+pimamon+V+II+Cnj+3Pl: ka-pimamoki   # they will run along, they will pass along a road or rail
      PV/ka+pimamon+V+II+Cnj+3Pl+Var/East: [ka-pimamokwâ, ka-pimamokiht]   # they will run along, they will pass along a road or rail
      PV/ka+pimamon+V+II+Cnj+4Pl: ka-pimamonithiki   # they over there will run along, they over there will pass along a road or rail
      PV/ka+pimamon+V+II+Cnj+4Pl+Var/East: ka-pimamonithikwâ   # they over there will run along, they over there will pass along a road or rail
      

      # Inf # PV/ta
      PV/ta+pimamon+V+II+Cnj+3Sg: ta-pimamok   # it runs along, it passes along a road or rail
      PV/ta+pimamon+V+II+Cnj+4Sg: ta-pimamonithik   # it over there runs along, it over there passes along a road or rail
      PV/ta+pimamon+V+II+Cnj+3Pl: ta-pimamoki   # they run along, they pass along a road or rail
      PV/ta+pimamon+V+II+Cnj+3Pl+Var/East: [ta-pimamokwâ, ta-pimamokiht]   # they run along, they pass along a road or rail
      PV/ta+pimamon+V+II+Cnj+4Pl: ta-pimamonithiki   # they over there run along, they over there pass along a road or rail
      PV/ta+pimamon+V+II+Cnj+4Pl+Var/East: ta-pimamonithikwâ   # they over there run along, they over there pass along a road or rail
      

      # Fut # Cond
      pimamon+V+II+Fut+Cond+3Sg: pimamoki   # when it runs along, when it passes along a road or rail
      pimamon+V+II+Fut+Cond+4Sg: pimamonithiki   # when it over there runs along, when it over there passes along a road or rail
      pimamon+V+II+Fut+Cond+3Pl: pimamokwâwi   # when they run along, when they pass along a road or rail
      pimamon+V+II+Fut+Cond+4Pl: pimamonithikwâwi   # when they over there run along, when they over there pass along a road or rail
      
